Massachusetts, session 194th, H2116.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 148A of Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “employer” in line 1, the following:- as
that term is defined in Section 148 of this Chapter
of 1